dev/noun/noun.ne.dix
  <!-- आमा; आमा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="आमा__n_mf_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अध्ययन; अध्ययन; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अध्ययन__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- गोली; गोली; 1 -->
    <pardef n="गोली__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- उत्पादन; उत्पादन; 1 -->
    <pardef n="उत्पादन__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- भाग; भाग; 1 -->
    <pardef n="भाग__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- जन; जन; 1 -->
    <pardef n="जन__n_nt_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ता</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बेला; बेला; 1 -->
    <pardef n="बेला__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- शक्ति; शक्ति; 1 -->
    <pardef n="शक्ति__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- संसार; संसार; 1 -->
    <pardef n="संसार__n_nt_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- स्थिति; स्थिति; 1 -->
    <pardef n="स्थिति__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सेना; सेना; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सेना__n_nt_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- मन्दिर; मन्दिर; 1 -->
    <pardef n="मन्दिर__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sp"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- विश्वास; विश्वास; 1 -->
    <pardef n="विश्वास__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बाबु; बाबु; 1 -->
    <pardef n="बाबु__n_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- कलाकार; कलाकार; 1 -->
    <pardef n="कलाकार__n_mf_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- आवाज; आवाज; 1 -->
    <pardef n="आवाज__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- भावना; भावना; 1 -->
    <pardef n="भावना__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- घटना; घटना; 1 -->
    <pardef n="घटना__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- नेकपा; नेकपा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="नेकपा__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- खर्च; खर्च; 1 -->
    <pardef n="खर्च__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- विचार; विचार; 1 -->
    <pardef n="विचार__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- नीति; नीति; 1 -->
    <pardef n="नीति__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- उपभोक्ता; उपभोक्ता; 1 -->
    <pardef n="उपभोक्ता__n_nt_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- जग्गा; जग्गा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="जग्गा__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- आज; आज; 1 -->
    <pardef n="आज__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पटक; पटक; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पटक__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- प्रेम; प्रेम; 1 -->
    <pardef n="प्रेम__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- भाइ; भाइ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="भाइ__n_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- थाहा; थाहा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="थाहा__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पर्यटक; पर्यटक; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पर्यटक__n_mf_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- समस्या; समस्या; 1 -->
    <pardef n="समस्या__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- प्रतिशत; प्रतिशत; 1 -->
    <pardef n="प्रतिशत__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- मानिस; मानिस; 1 -->
    <pardef n="मानिस__n_mf_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- व्यापार; व्यापार; 1 -->
    <pardef n="व्यापार__n_mf_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- म; म; 1 -->
    <pardef n="म__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="aa"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- क्रम; क्रम; 1 -->
    <pardef n="क्रम__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- घर; घर; 1 -->
    <pardef n="घर__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सरकार; सरकार; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सरकार__n_nt_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="आमा"><i>आमा</i><par n="आमा__n_mf_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="अध्ययन"><i>अध्ययन</i><par n="अध्ययन__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="गोली"><i>गोली</i><par n="गोली__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="उत्पादन"><i>उत्पादन</i><par n="उत्पादन__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="भाग"><i>भाग</i><par n="भाग__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="जन"><i>जन</i><par n="जन__n_nt_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="बेला"><i>बेला</i><par n="बेला__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="शक्ति"><i>शक्ति</i><par n="शक्ति__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="संसार"><i>संसार</i><par n="संसार__n_nt_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="स्थिति"><i>स्थिति</i><par n="स्थिति__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="सेना"><i>सेना</i><par n="सेना__n_nt_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="मन्दिर"><i>मन्दिर</i><par n="मन्दिर__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="विश्वास"><i>विश्वास</i><par n="विश्वास__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="बाबु"><i>बाबु</i><par n="बाबु__n_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="कलाकार"><i>कलाकार</i><par n="कलाकार__n_mf_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="आवाज"><i>आवाज</i><par n="आवाज__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="भावना"><i>भावना</i><par n="भावना__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="घटना"><i>घटना</i><par n="घटना__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="नेकपा"><i>नेकपा</i><par n="नेकपा__np"/></e>
    <e lm="खर्च"><i>खर्च</i><par n="खर्च__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="विचार"><i>विचार</i><par n="विचार__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="नीति"><i>नीति</i><par n="नीति__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="उपभोक्ता"><i>उपभोक्ता</i><par n="उपभोक्ता__n_nt_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="जग्गा"><i>जग्गा</i><par n="जग्गा__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="आज"><i>आज</i><par n="आज__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="पटक"><i>पटक</i><par n="पटक__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रेम"><i>प्रेम</i><par n="प्रेम__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="भाइ"><i>भाइ</i><par n="भाइ__n_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="थाहा"><i>थाहा</i><par n="थाहा__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="पर्यटक"><i>पर्यटक</i><par n="पर्यटक__n_mf_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="समस्या"><i>समस्या</i><par n="समस्या__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रतिशत"><i>प्रतिशत</i><par n="प्रतिशत__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="मानिस"><i>मानिस</i><par n="मानिस__n_mf_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="व्यापार"><i>व्यापार</i><par n="व्यापार__n_mf_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="म"><i>म</i><par n="म__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="क्रम"><i>क्रम</i><par n="क्रम__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="घर"><i>घर</i><par n="घर__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="सरकार"><i>सरकार</i><par n="सरकार__n_nt_aa"/></e>
